Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-805
Act, how construed; limit on creation of authority.

(1) Nothing in the Regional Metropolitan Transit Authority Act shall be construed to prohibit any municipality from contracting directly for passenger transportation services with a transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law or with any regional metropolitan transit authority, other than a municipality in which the operating jurisdiction of a regional metropolitan transit authority has been extended pursuant to section 18-804.

(2) No more than one regional metropolitan transit authority shall be created within a single metropolitan statistical area or combined statistical area.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 5.

Transit Authority Law, see section 14-1826.